Utah statutes.
78B-6-803.   Right of tenant of agricultural lands to hold over.

In all cases of tenancy upon agricultural lands, where the tenant has held over and retained possession for more than 60 days after the expiration of the term without any demand of possession or notice to quit by the owner, the tenant shall be considered to be in possession by permission of the owner.  The tenant shall be entitled to hold under the terms of the lease for another full year and may not be guilty of an unlawful detainer during that year.  The holding over for the 60-day period shall be taken and construed as a consent on the part of the tenant to hold for another year.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

